Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-349
State parks; use of name for trade purposes, prohibited; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation carrying on within this state any business of whatever nature, conducted for profit, to adopt or use, as the name of the business, the name of any state park owned by the State of Nebraska. It shall further be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation selling any commodity or service of any kind or nature whatever within this state to adopt or use, as a trade name, designation, or trademark of the commodity or service, the name of any state park owned by the State of Nebraska. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit or interfere in any way with the activities or powers of the commission. Any person, firm, or corporation which violates this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1927, c. 159, § 1, p. 422;

C.S.1929, § 81-6516;

R.S.1943, § 81-815;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 48;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 107.